District of Columbia statutes.
38-371

Office of the Student Advocate.

[Not funded].

History

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-76, § 202, 61 DCR 39

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-2652.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-74: Section 401 of D.C. Law 20-74 provided that Title II [§§ 201-205] of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.